California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Information regarding the goals and requirements of the vocational rehabilitation program, the state plan, and federal and state statutes and regulations governing the program.

(b) Instruction in how to protect the rights of appellants at administrative hearings, with emphasis on assisting, where appropriate, those appellants represented by themselves or an advocate inexperienced in administrative hearings in fully developing the administrative record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 47.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 27, 2012, by Sec. 59 of Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

19708.

(a) Information in the appellant’s case record shall, upon request and proper identification, be disclosed to the person or his or her authorized representative. Medical, psychological, or other information which the department believes may be harmful to the person shall not be released directly to that person, but shall be provided through his or her authorized representative, including, but not limited to, a physician or a licensed or certified psychologist. All records made or kept by any public officer or agency in connection with the administration of any vocational rehabilitation program shall be open for inspection by the applicant or client to which the information relates and by any other person authorized in writing by the applicant or client. The written authorization shall be dated and signed by the applicant or client and shall expire one year from the date of execution.

(b) In the event of any hearing under the provisions of this chapter, the authorized representative of the appellant shall be entitled to inspect the case record relating to the appellant prior to, as well as during, the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 758, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

19709.

(a) The appellant, within six months after receiving notice of the impartial hearing officer’s final decision, may file a petition with the superior court, under Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, praying for a review of the entire proceedings in the matter, upon questions of law involved in the case. The review, if granted, shall be the exclusive remedy available to the appellant for review of the impartial hearing officer’s
 final decision. The department shall be the sole respondent in the proceedings.

(b) No filing fee shall be required for the filing of a petition pursuant to this section. Any of these petitions to the superior court shall be entitled to a preference in setting a date for hearing on the petition. No bond shall be required in the case of any petition for review, nor in any appeal therefrom. The appellant shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, if he or she obtains a decision in his or her favor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 49.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 27, 2012, by Sec. 59 of Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

19710.

Until January 1, 2014, the adoption and readoption of regulations to modify appeals processes consistent with this part shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review of the emergency regulations by the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 50.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 27, 2012, by Sec. 59 of Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Job Development [19725. - 19726.]

19725.

(a) For the purpose of providing self-employment opportunities for clients with severe disabilities of the Department of Rehabilitation who are determined by the department to be eligible for such a program, the authorized officials of any county, city, city and county, or other political subdivision of the state may enter into appropriate written agreements with the Department of Rehabilitation providing for the installation and operation of business facilities on property owned or occupied by the various political subdivisions. The Business Development Services Section
 of the Department of Rehabilitation shall supervise the operation of such facilities. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations relating to the establishment and operation of the business facilities.

(b) For the purpose of this section, business facilities shall not include vending stands or food service facilities authorized by the Business Enterprise for the Blind Program established by Article 5 (commencing with Section 19625) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and nothing in this section shall be construed to affect in any way the Business Enterprises for the Blind Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 797, Sec. 11.   (AB 248)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19726.

(a) The Department of Rehabilitation shall establish by December 31, 2021, subject to appropriation within the Budget Act, a targeted disability employment program to increase employment opportunities for people with disabilities to work toward and achieve competitive integrated employment. The program shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Be developed in consultation with the Department of Developmental Services and other stakeholders specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4870.1.

(2) Provide contracts or grants for entities to initiate a targeted marketing campaign and incentivize employers to hire individuals with
 disabilities through technical assistance, contracts or grants to make workplaces accessible, develop industry-recognized work-based learning opportunities, and support employment training for managers and human resources professionals.

(b) The Department shall provide evaluation reports on the implementation of the program required pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Legislature, no later than May 14, 2022, May 14, 2023, and May 14, 2024, that shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the stakeholder consultation.

(2) The number of contracts or grants issued.

(3) The number of businesses targeted for the media campaign.

(4) The number of businesses that received technical
 assistance.

(5) The number of entities that received contracts or grants to make workplaces accessible.

(6) The number of work-based learning programs established through partnerships with entities.

(7) The number of participants in the program who are working toward or who have achieved competitive integrated employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 76, Sec. 64.   (AB 136)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Independent Living Rehabilitation Services [19750. - 19755.]

19750.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish program standards and authorize procedures utilized for subgranting funds, auditing records, and monitoring the delivery of services pursuant to the Independent Living Services Program created pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 32.5.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19751.

The department shall administer the Independent Living Services Program. This program shall provide services to individuals with significant disabilities, in accordance with federal law. The department shall, in the administration of the program, subgrant its allocation of federal funds, and shall comply with all requirements set forth in the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended,
 and with all rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 9.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19752.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, expenditures shall be limited to providing only those services specified in Section 706 of Title 29 of the United States Code, when those services cannot be secured through any other source of funding. Services shall only be provided to the extent that federal funds designated for ILRS have been received by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 33.5.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19753.

Financial need shall be considered in the furnishing or denial of independent living services in accordance with the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and any subsequent amendments thereto, and regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 34.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19754.

To ensure high quality services and proper and effective expenditure of funds, the department may monitor services provided by, or conduct a fiscal review or audit the records of, any agency, organization, or facility receiving funds pursuant to this chapter. When the department chooses to monitor services or conduct an audit or fiscal review, the agency, organization, or facility shall cooperate with the department to the fullest extent possible. If the department determines that funds have been improperly expended, the department shall be reimbursed by the subgrantee for the amount of the overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 858, Sec. 3.   Effective September 23, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

19755.

(a) Pursuant to Sections 19006 and 19016, the department shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Regulations adopted to implement this chapter shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 858, Sec. 3.   Effective September 23, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Independent Living Centers [19800. - 19806.]

19800.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that individuals with disabilities comprise a large percentage of California’s total population and that action is necessary to assist these individuals in their attempts to live fuller and freer lives outside institutions. To achieve this, it is necessary to:

(a) Provide state funding to maintain the services provided by existing independent living centers and, where feasible, encourage the establishment of new centers which provide services to individuals with disabilities; and

(b) Vest in the Department of Rehabilitation the responsibility and authority for the encouragement of the planning, developing, and funding of independent living centers. The Department of Rehabilitation shall consult with existing independent living centers and the State Independent Living Council in this state regarding funding procedures and decisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 46.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19801.

An independent living center shall:

(a) Be a private, nonprofit organization controlled by a board of directors. A majority of the board shall be comprised of individuals with disabilities.

(b) Be staffed by persons trained to assist persons with disabilities in achieving social and economic independence. The staff shall include as large a proportion as is practicable of individuals with disabilities.

(c) Provide, but not be limited to, the following services to individuals with disabilities:

(1) Peer counseling.

(2) Advocacy.

(3) Attendant referral.

(4) Housing assistance.

(5) Information and referral.

(d) Provide other services and referrals as may be deemed necessary, such as transportation, job development, equipment maintenance and evaluation, training in independent living skills, mobility assistance, assistive technology, and communication assistance. Assistive technology may include information and outreach about appropriate assistive technology devices or services and referrals that will enable individuals to gain access to assistive technology in order to meet their needs and expand options for independence and productivity. Assistive technology activities shall involve collaboration with the Department of Rehabilitation and the nonprofit contractor selected to implement the federal Assistive Technology Act of 1998 (P.L. 105-394), which shall serve as the framework for offering assistance to individuals with disabilities.

(e) Promote and practice the independent living philosophy of:

(1) Consumer control of the center regarding decisionmaking, service delivery, management, and establishment of the policy and direction of the center.

(2) Self-help and self-advocacy.

(3) Development of peer relationships and peer role models.

(4) Equal access of individuals with disabilities to society and to all services, programs activities, resources, and facilities, whether public or private and regardless of the funding source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 493, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19802.

For the purposes of this chapter, an “individual with a disability” is as defined pursuant to the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Section 705 of Title 29 of the United States Code), as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 190, Sec. 10.   (AB 2877)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19803.

Services provided to individuals with disabilities shall be tailored to suit the individual needs and shall be available to individuals with all types of disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 48.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19804.

An independent living center shall not operate in conjunction with or be affiliated with a residential living center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 191.)
-------------------------------------------

19805.

(a) The Department of Rehabilitation may advance to an independent living center an amount, each month, not in excess of one-twelfth of the annual allocation for the independent living center.

(b) The Department of Rehabilitation may advance to any contractor or grantee receiving funds pursuant to this chapter an amount, each month, not in excess of one-twelfth of the annual allocation for the contractor or grantee.

(c) To obtain approval by the department for a funding advance pursuant to this section, a grantee of a funding advance shall meet accounting and reporting criteria established by the Department of Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 659, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19806.

(a) An independent living center shall not be required to provide any matching funds through private contributions as a condition of receiving state funds except to acquire state incentive funds.

(b) Each independent living center, except those centers which have been both established and maintained using federal funding under Title VII(c) of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 as amended as their primary base grant, as determined by the department, shall receive to the extent funds are appropriated by the Legislature, at least two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) in base grant funds allocated by the department. The department shall allocate to those centers with Title VII(c) base grant funds of less than two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) an amount that, when combined with the Title VII(c) grant, equals two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000).

(c) State funds described in subdivision (b) may be replaced by reimbursements under the Supplemental Security Disability Insurance and the Supplemental Security Income programs provided for under Titles II and XVII of the Federal Social Security Act, Subchapter II (commencing with Section 401) and Subchapter XVII (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code to the extent appropriated by the Legislature and allocated by the department to independent living centers under this chapter. Beginning with the 1998–99 fiscal year, and each year thereafter, to the extent these funds from the Social Security Act are not appropriated by the Legislature as were appropriated in the 1997–98 fiscal year, an amount equal to the combined state and federal fund allocation to independent living centers in the Budget Act of 1997 shall be appropriated to, and allocated by, the department to independent living centers under this chapter.

(d) (1) Available state incentive funds shall be allocated at the beginning of each fiscal year based upon the average amount of private contributions received by the independent living center in the second and third preceding fiscal years.

(2) The maximum amount of incentive funds that may be allocated to any independent living center in any single fiscal year shall be computed as follows:

(A) “Pool One” is defined as 60 percent of all state incentive funds. “Pool Two” is defined as 40 percent of all state incentive funds. Each independent living center shall be entitled to an equal portion of Pool One, not to exceed the amounts raised pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) Incentive funds from Pool One not used after the initial allocation pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be added to Pool Two for allocation among all centers that had unmatched private contributions after distribution of Pool One funds. Pool Two funds shall be awarded in direct proportion to each center’s percentage of the total remaining unmatched private contributions raised by those independent living centers.

(3) For the purpose of determining eligibility for state incentive funds, any independent living center that uses a fiscal year other than the state fiscal year may elect to use a different fiscal year so long as the closing date of the fiscal year so elected does not precede the closing date of the equivalent state fiscal year by more than 11 months.

(4) The amount of private contributions claimed by an independent living center for each fiscal year shall be verified by the department by utilizing appropriate financial records including, but not limited to, independent audits. Audits may be performed by the department up to three years from the close of the fiscal year during which state incentive funds were received by the independent living center being audited.

(5) State incentive funds that are not distributed to independent living centers shall not be allocated or retained by the department for distribution as state incentive funds in later fiscal years.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Private funds” does not include any funds originating from any entity of the federal, state, city, or county government or any political subdivision thereof. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, fees from any source for services provided may be included as private contributions by an independent living center for purposes of determining its allocation of incentive funds.

(2) “State incentive funds” means state funds appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this chapter, except those funds allocated by the department pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (g) of this section.

(f) Any funds allocated under this chapter to any independent living center, other than as part of the initial allocation for each fiscal year, shall be made by contract amendment. Any contract amendment shall require the provision of services in addition to those required by the contract being amended. All those services required by contract amendment shall not be performed prior to the date the contract amendment is approved by the state.

(g) To the extent funds are appropriated by the Legislature for the purpose of providing assistive technology services described in subdivision (d) of Section 19801, two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000) of those funds shall be allocated to the nonprofit contractor selected by the Department of Rehabilitation to coordinate delivery of assistive technology services and the remainder shall be allocated equally among independent living centers. The nonprofit contractor shall provide statewide assistive technology information and referral and serve as a resource to the independent living centers’ assistive technology service programs.

(h) To the extent funds are appropriated by the Legislature, after allocation of base grant and incentive funds and assistive technology funds, remaining funds shall be allocated by the department among independent living centers on the basis of the ratio of the total of the general population in an independent living center’s geographic service areas as compared to the total of the general population in all independent living centers geographic services area statewide. The department shall adopt regulations for the distribution of population funds by June 30, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 61.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11.5. SUPPORTED DECISIONMAKING [21000. - 21008.]

21000.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Adults with disabilities, including older adults with disabilities, are presumed competent and to have the capacity to make decisions regarding their day-to-day health, safety, welfare, and social and financial affairs, unless otherwise determined through legal proceedings.

(b) All adults, to the best of their ability and with supports they choose, should be able to be informed about, and participate in, the management of their affairs.

(c) Like adults without disabilities, adults with disabilities may use a wide range of voluntary supports to help them understand, make, and
 communicate their own decisions. These voluntary arrangements should be encouraged and recognized as a valid way for people with disabilities to strengthen their capacity and maintain their autonomy.

(d) The capacity of an adult should be assessed with any supports, including supported decisionmaking, that the person is using or could use.

(e) Supported decisionmaking offers adults with disabilities a flexible way to maintain autonomy and decisionmaking authority over their own lives by developing and maintaining voluntary supports to assist them in understanding, making, communicating, and implementing their own informed choices.

(f) Supported decisionmaking can be a way to strengthen the capacity of an adult with a disability.

(g) Supported
 decisionmaking is one of several options available to adults with disabilities to understand, make, and communicate decisions and to express preferences, including, but not limited to, medical and financial powers of attorney, authorized representative forms, health care directives, release of information forms, and representative payees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21001.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this division:

(a) “Adult with a disability” means an adult with any disability, including an older adult with a disability or an age-related disability. Disability includes, but is not limited to, an intellectual or developmental disability, cognitive disability, communication disability, psychiatric disability, physical disability, sensory disability, learning disability, dementia, cognitive impairment, Alzheimer’s disease, major neurocognitive disorder, or chronic illness or condition.

(b) “Life decision” means any decision that affects the adult with a disability, including, but not limited to, a decision regarding any medical, psychological,
 financial, educational, living arrangement, access to home and community-based services, social, sexual, religious, or occupational matter.

(c) “Supported decisionmaking” means an individualized process of supporting and accommodating an adult with a disability to enable them to make life decisions without impeding the self-determination of the adult.

(d) “Supported decisionmaking agreement” means a voluntary, written agreement, written in plain language accessible to the adult with a disability and in conformance with Section 21005. A supported decisionmaking agreement shall be signed in conformance with subdivision (b) of Section 21005 and may be revoked orally or in writing at any time by either party. A supported decisionmaking agreement may include images, be read aloud, or be video or audio recorded, in addition to the written version.

(e) “Supporter” means one or more adults who meet the requirements in Section 21002 and who enter into a supported decisionmaking agreement to help the adult with a disability make decisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.

(a) A supporter is bound by all existing obligations and prohibitions otherwise applicable by law that protect adults with disabilities and the elderly from fraud, abuse, neglect, coercion, or mistreatment. This division does not limit a supporter’s civil or criminal liability for prohibited conduct against the adult with a disability, including liability for fraud, abuse, neglect, breach of fiduciary duty, if any exists, coercion, or mistreatment, including liability under the Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9), including, but not limited to, Sections 15656 and 15657.

(b) An individual shall not be selected as a supporter or continue as a supporter of an
 adult with a disability in any of the following circumstances:

(1) The adult with a disability previously made, or makes, an allegation against the supporter under the Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act.

(2) The adult with a disability has obtained, or obtains, an order of protection from abuse against the supporter.

(3) The supporter is the subject of a civil or criminal order prohibiting contact with the adult with the disability, or is subject to a restraining order with respect to the adult with a disability.

(4) The supporter has been removed as the conservator of the adult with a disability, based upon a finding that they did not act in the conservatee’s best interest.

(5) The supporter is found criminally, civilly, or administratively liable for abuse, neglect, mistreatment, coercion, or fraud.

(c) A supporter shall do all of the following:

(1) Support and implement the direction, will, and preferences of the adult with a disability.

(2) Respect the values, beliefs, and preferences of the adult with a disability.

(3) Act honestly, diligently, and in good faith.

(4) Act within the scope identified by the adult with a disability.

(5) Maintain confidentiality of any information obtained by a supporter, unless the adult with a disability specifically authorizes its disclosure.

(d) (1) A supporter shall not coerce an adult with a disability.

(2) Unless the supporter has a valid legal authorization to do so and the action is within the scope of their authority, a supporter shall not do either of the following:

(A) Make decisions for, or on behalf of, the adult with a disability.

(B) Sign documents on behalf of the adult with a disability.

(3) A supporter shall not obtain information not reasonably related to matters with which the adult with a disability has requested assistance, and shall not use or disclose information for any purpose other than supporting the adult with a disability.

(4) A supporter shall not participate in any life decision in which they have a conflict of interest. This includes, but is not limited to, any decision in which the supporter has a financial or other tangible stake in the outcome.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.

(a) An adult with a disability may choose to enter into a supported decisionmaking agreement with one or more chosen supporters. Support may include, but is not limited to, helping the adult with a disability obtain and understand information related to a life decision, communicating the decision to others, and assisting the individual to ensure their preferences and decisions are honored.

(b) An adult with a disability’s signing of a supported decisionmaking agreement does not preclude the adult with the disability from acting independently of a supported decisionmaking agreement and shall not be used by a court or other entity as evidence of incapacity. This subdivision does not limit the admissibility of evidence pursuant to Section 28 of
 Article 1 of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21004.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, an adult with a disability is entitled to have present one or more other adults, including supporters, in any meeting or discussion, or to participate in any written communication, including, but not limited to, individual planning meetings required by state or federal law, service and care planning meetings, discharge planning meetings, meetings with health care providers and individuals who provide residential services or long-term services and supports, and communications with a bank, financial institution, or financial planner.

(b) An adult with a disability may indicate that they wish to have one or more adults attend a meeting or discussion or participate in any written
 communication through oral statement, gesture, or any augmentative or alternative communication method used by the adult with a disability.

(c) A third party may only refuse the presence of one of more adults, including supporters, if the third party reasonably believes that there is fraud, coercion, abuse, or other action by the individuals requested to be included that the third party is required to report pursuant to the Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9).

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21005.

(a) A supported decisionmaking agreement shall be written in plain language accessible to the adult with the disability and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A list of the areas in which the adult with a disability requests support.

(2) A list of the areas in which the supporter agrees to provide the support.

(3) The supporter’s agreement that they meet each of the requirements specified in Section 21002.

(4) Information advising the adult with a disability about their right to file a report under the Elder Abuse and
 Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9), including, but not limited to, Sections 15656 and 15657.

(5) Information and copies of other supported or substituted decisionmaking documents the adult with a disability has in place, including, but not limited to, powers of attorney, authorizations to share medical or educational information, authorized representative forms, or representative payee agreements.

(b) A supported decisionmaking agreement shall be signed by the adult with a disability and each supporter, in the presence of two or more attesting and disinterested witnesses who are at least 18 years of age, or a notary public. The adult with a disability may use reasonable modifications, such as assistive technology or physical assistance, to sign the agreement.

(c) A supported decisionmaking agreement should be reviewed by all supporters and the adult with a disability every two years and updated as needed. An updated agreement shall be signed as required in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21006.

(a) (1) A supported decisionmaking agreement is effective until it is terminated in one of the following ways:

(A) By the adult with a disability.

(B) By all supporters.

(C) By the terms of the agreement.

(D) By the death of the adult with a disability.

(E) All supporters are no longer eligible to serve pursuant to Section 21002.

(2) Any party may choose to terminate their participation in the agreement
 at any time by providing written or oral notice of the termination to all parties to the agreement. An adult with a disability may terminate a supported decisionmaking agreement by other conduct intended to communicate termination, including by canceling, defacing, obliterating, burning, tearing, or otherwise destroying the supported decisionmaking agreement or directing another in the presence of the adult with a disability to destroy the supported decisionmaking agreement.

(b) If there is more than one supporter, the termination by one supporter does not terminate the supported decisionmaking agreement with respect to other supporters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21007.

This division does not apply to CARE court proceedings or to a CARE supporter trained and appointed under the Community Assistance, Recovery, and Empowerment (CARE) Act (Part 8 (commencing with Section 5970) of Division 5).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21008.

In developing educational information or training materials on supported decisionmaking or supported decisionmaking agreements, the California Health and Human Services Agency or any departments under its jurisdiction shall do all of the following:

(a) Consider the needs of individuals who have been underserved, including, but not limited to, immigrants, individuals whose preferred language is not English, individuals from rural communities, and individuals living in long-term care facilities.

(b) Consider existing materials and resources on supported decisionmaking and best practices developed nationwide.

(c) Consult with stakeholders
 to provide input about the information, materials, and training being developed. The stakeholders shall include persons with a disability, including an older adult with a disability, family members of a person with a disability and family members of an older adult living in a long-term care facility, and one representative of each of the following: the State Council on Developmental Disabilities; the protection and advocacy agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900; the client’s rights advocate described in Section 4433; a disability organization; the California Health and Human Services Agency’s Alzheimer’s and Related Disorders Advisory Committee, the departments’ ombudsperson offices; and an organization representing older adults.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 894, Sec. 16.   (AB 1663)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. CALIFORNIA PARTNERSHIP FOR LONG-TERM CARE [22000. - 22010.]

22000.

The California Partnership for Long-Term Care Program is hereby established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 802, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

The purpose of the program is to link private long-term care insurance and health care service plan contracts that cover long-term care with the In-Home Supportive Services program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9) and Medi-Cal, and to provide specified in-home supportive services benefits and specified Medi-Cal benefits to the purchasers of approved and certified insurance policies and health care service plan contracts who qualify under the special provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 802, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall seek any federal waivers and approvals necessary to accomplish the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 3.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

(a) Individuals who participate in the program and have resources above the eligibility levels for receipt of medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act (Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code) shall be eligible to receive those in-home supportive services benefits specified by the State Department of Social Services, and those Medi-Cal benefits specified by the State Department of Health Care Services, for which they would otherwise be eligible, if, prior to becoming eligible for benefits, they have purchased a long-term care insurance policy or a health care service plan contract covering long-term care that has been certified by the State Department of Health Care
 Services pursuant to this division.

(b) Individuals may purchase approved and certified long-term care insurance policies or health care service plan contracts which cover long-term care services in amounts equal to the resources they wish to protect, so long as the amount of insurance purchased exceeds the minimum level set by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 22009.

(c) The resource protection provided by this division shall be effective only for long-term care policies, and health care service plan contracts that cover long-term care services, when the policy or contract is delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on July 1, 1993, and thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 487, Sec. 4.   (SB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the resources, to the extent described in subdivision (c), of an individual who purchases an approved and certified long-term care insurance policy or health care service plan contract which covers long-term care services shall not be considered by:

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services in determining:

(1) Medi-Cal eligibility.

(2) The amount of any Medi-Cal payment.

(3) The amount of any subsequent recovery by the state of payments made for medical services.

(b) The State Department of Social Services in determining:

(1) Eligibility for in-home supportive services provided pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Division 9.

(2) The amount of any payment for in-home supportive services.

(c) The resources not to be considered as provided by this section shall be equal to, or in some proportion set by the State Department of Health Care Services or State Department of Social Services that is less than equal to, the amount of long-term care insurance payments or benefits made as described in Section 22006.
